Hawaii statutes.
[§392-24] Waiting period. No temporary
disability benefits shall be payable during the first seven consecutive days of
any period of disability. Consecutive periods of disability due to the same or
related cause and not separated by an interval of more than two weeks shall be
considered as a single period of disability. [L 1969, c 148, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next